Utah statutes.
7-1-806.   Money market funds arranging with bank to honor two-party
instruments -- Discouraging payment of interest to two persons on funds in
transit -- Pyramiding and similar schemes as misdemeanors.
Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent money market funds from
making arrangements with banks to honor two party checks, drafts, or other
instruments.
The commissioner shall exert his influence to discourage banks, money market
funds and other programs in Utah and throughout the United States from paying
interest to two persons at the same time on funds in the process of transfer.
The process or the practice referred to as pyramiding or any similar process
or practice as defined by the commissioner, and such definition is approved by
the governor, shall be prohibited within this state and persons found guilty
of these schemes shall be found guilty of a class C misdemeanor.  This does
not preclude more serious punishment under federal law.
Money market funds, similar funds and bank regulated institutions shall
cooperate with the commissioner to stop these practices.
